Utah statutes.
9-4-906.   Relation to certain acts.

(1)  The corporation is exempt from:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(c)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code; and

(d)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(e)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(f)  Title 63J, Chapter 2, Revenue Procedures and Control Act;

(g)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The corporation shall comply with:

(a)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act; and

(b)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

